Washington statutes.
RCW 19.310.030

Notice of change in control—Exceptions.

(1) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, a person who engages in business as an exchange facilitator shall notify all existing exchange clients whose relinquished property is located in this state, or whose replacement property held under a qualified exchange accommodation agreement is located in this state, of any change in control of the exchange facilitator. Notification must be provided within ten business days of the effective date of the change in control by hand delivery, facsimile, electronic mail, overnight mail, or first-class mail, and must be posted on the exchange facilitator's internet website for at least ninety days following the change in control. The notification must set forth the name, address, and other contact information of the transferees.

(2) If an exchange facilitator is a publicly traded company or wholly owned subsidiary of the publicly traded company and remains a publicly traded company or wholly owned subsidiary of the publicly traded company after a change in control, the publicly traded company or wholly owned subsidiary of the publicly traded company is not required to notify its existing clients of the change in control.

(3) For purposes of this section, "change in control" means any transfer of more than fifty percent of the assets or ownership interests, directly or indirectly, of the exchange facilitator.

[ 2009 c 70 s 4.]